Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 12.1 Primaries for Election of Delegates to National Conventions and for Presidential Preference

17-12.1-1.
Date of primaries for election of delegates to national conventions.

A primary election for the election of delegates to the national convention for each political party shall be held in the manner provided in this chapter on the fourth Tuesday in April 2012, and every fourth year thereafter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 275, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 303, § 1.

17-12.1-2.
Number of delegates to be elected — Method of election.

At each primary there shall be elected for each congressional district of this state the number of delegates and alternates that shall be determined by the national committee of the party and certified to the secretary of state not later than the first Tuesday in January preceding the primary by the state committee of the party. The method of election of candidates for delegate shall be in accordance with party rules certified to the secretary of state by the chairperson of the state committee on or before the first Tuesday in January of each year a primary is to be held pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 275, § 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 287, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 183, § 1.

17-12.1-3.
Declaration of candidacy — Delegates.

During the sixty-first (61st) and sixty-second (62nd) day preceding a primary for election of delegates to a national convention, each voter desiring to be a delegate at the forthcoming convention shall, on the form that shall be provided by the secretary of state, sign his or her name as it appears on the voting list and file, not later than four (4:00) p.m. of the date of filing with the secretary of state, a declaration of candidacy which shall include the following information:

His or her name and address as they appear on the voting list, party designation, place and date of birth, and length of residence in the state and in the town or city where he or she resides.

A statement that, if elected, he or she would comply with all party rules of the national committee of the party designated in subdivision (1) of this section relating to delegates to national conventions and conducting of national conventions.

At the same time as the declaration of candidacy is filed, the appropriate pledge of support form provided to the secretary of state by the political parties must be filed by the candidate for delegate.

If any candidate for delegate does not thereafter wish his or her name to appear on the ballot, the candidate shall, at least forty-nine (49) days prior to the date for the primary, file an affidavit with the secretary of state stating his or her name may not be placed on the ballot and the secretary of state shall not place that candidate’s name on the ballot.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 275, § 3; P.L. 1983, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 390, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 479, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 303, § 1.

17-12.1-4.
Presidential candidates.

Any person seeking the endorsement of a national political party for which a primary is being held shall, during the ninety-fourth (94th) through and including the ninety-sixth (96th) day preceding the presidential preference primary being held, provide written notification to the secretary of state of his or her intention to run in the presidential preference primary. When the deadline falls on a Saturday, said written notification may be filed with the secretary of state on that Saturday until noon (12:00) p.m. The notification shall include the candidate’s name and address and a statement affirming their eligibility, under the laws and Constitution of the United States, to serve, if elected, in the office of President of the United States. The notification shall also include the name and contact information of the designee authorized by the presidential candidate to act in his/her stead in Rhode Island.

Upon receipt of the notification referred to in subsection (a) of this section, the secretary of state shall, by six o’clock (6:00) p.m. on the same day, prepare petition papers for candidates who are eligible to serve in the office of President of the United States, clearly marked with the candidate’s name, party designation, and the office the candidate seeks; provided, however, that for notifications filed on a Saturday deadline by noon (12:00) p.m., petition papers shall be prepared by two o’clock (2:00) p.m. on that Saturday.

The petition papers of a candidate for president shall be signed, in the aggregate, by at least one thousand (1,000) eligible voters and shall be submitted on or before four o’clock (4:00) p.m. in the afternoon of the eighty-second (82nd) day before the presidential preference primary to the local board of the city or town where the signers appear to be voters, and the petition papers shall be checked, processed, and certified to the secretary of state by the local boards before four o’clock (4:00) p.m. in the afternoon of the sixty-ninth (69th) day before the presidential preference primary. When nomination papers have been duly certified by the appropriate local boards of canvassers, they shall be conclusively presumed to be valid, unless written objections to them are made as to the eligibility of the candidate or the sufficiency of the nomination papers or the signatures on them. All objections shall be filed with the state board of elections by four o’clock (4:00) p.m. on the next business day after the last day fixed for local boards to file nomination papers with the secretary of state. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the secretary of state from disqualifying a candidate based on the determination of the secretary of state that the nomination papers or the signatures on them are invalid or insufficient.

The decision of the state board shall be rendered not later than four o’clock (4:00) p.m. on the sixty-third (63rd) day before the presidential preference primary and shall immediately be certified by the state board to the secretary of state.

If any candidate for presidential nomination does not qualify for ballot placement, the names of delegates committed to this disqualified presidential candidate, who are otherwise qualified, shall appear on the ballot in accordance with party rules.

If any candidate whose name has been announced as a presidential nominee does not thereafter wish his or her name to appear on the ballot, the candidate shall, at least sixty-three (63) days prior to the date for the primary, file an affidavit with the secretary of state stating his or her name may not be placed on the ballot and the secretary of state shall not place that candidate’s name on the ballot. Said affidavit must be signed by the presidential candidate or his or her designee on file with the office of the secretary of state. Names of delegates committed to the withdrawn candidate, who are otherwise qualified, shall appear on the ballot in accordance with party rules.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 275, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 390, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 479, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 303, § 1.

17-12.1-5.
Preparation of nomination papers — Delegates.

Upon receipt of the declaration referred to in §

17-12.1-3

, the secretary of state shall prepare nomination papers for each candidate who has qualified, clearly marked with the candidate’s name and the office the candidate seeks, and shall, by four o’clock (4:00) p.m. on the next business day after receipt of the declaration, deliver the nomination papers to the proper candidate or to those persons that the candidate, in writing, designates to receive them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 275, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 350, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 390, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 479, § 1.

17-12.1-6.
Number of signers required.

The nomination papers of a candidate for delegate to a national convention shall be signed, in the aggregate, by at least one hundred fifty (150) eligible voters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 275, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 303, § 1.

17-12.1-7.
Checking and certification of nomination papers.

Each nomination paper of a candidate for delegate shall be submitted on or before four o’clock (4:00) p.m. in the afternoon of the fifty-sixth (56th) day before the presidential preference primary to the local board of the city or town where the signers appear to be voters, and the nomination papers shall be checked, processed, and certified to the secretary of state by the local boards before four o’clock (4:00) p.m. in the afternoon of the fifty-third (53rd) day before the presidential preference primary. In addition, each candidate for delegate to a national convention may, on or before four o’clock (4:00) p.m. in the afternoon of the forty-ninth (49th) day before the presidential primary, submit to the secretary of state documentation from a candidate, as set forth in §

17-12.1-4

, that he or she has the approval of the candidate for presidential nominee or approval from the steering/screening committee to name the candidates’ delegates to be identified with him or her. Names of delegates pledged to a presidential candidate who do not receive approval of the candidate for presidential nominee or approval from the steering/screening committee to name the candidates’ delegates to be identified with him/her, who are otherwise qualified, shall appear on the ballot in accordance with party rules.

When nomination papers have been duly certified by the appropriate local boards of canvassers, they shall be conclusively presumed to be valid, unless written objections to them are made as to the eligibility of the candidate or the sufficiency of the nomination papers or the signatures on them. All objections shall be filed with the state board of elections by four o’clock (4:00) p.m. on the next business day after the last day fixed for local boards to file nomination papers with the secretary of state. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the secretary of state from disqualifying a candidate based on the determination of the secretary of state that the nomination papers or the signatures on them are invalid or insufficient.

The decision of the state board shall be rendered not later than four o’clock (4:00) p.m. on the forty-seventh (47th) day before the presidential preference primary and shall immediately be certified by the state board to the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 275, § 2; P.L. 1976, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 390, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 479, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 303, § 1.

17-12.1-8.
Presidential preference primary.

On the same date and at the same time as the election of delegates to national conventions, as provided in §

17-12.1-1

, there shall be held a presidential preference primary for each political party at which each party voter shall have the opportunity to vote his or her preference for his or her choice for one person to be the candidate of his or her party for president of the United States.

The secretary of state shall place on the ballot the name of all persons qualified as candidates for presidential nominee as provided in §

17-12.1-4

, and who have not filed with the secretary of state the affidavit as provided in §

17-12.1-4

, and shall list under the name of each candidate for presidential nominee, arranged by lot, the names of all candidates for delegates to a national convention who submitted the approval of the candidate for presidential nominee as set forth in §

17-12.1-7

. All other candidates for delegates to a national convention shall be listed on the ballot, arranged by lot, as uncommitted, unless otherwise specified in party rules.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 275, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 8; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 8; P.L. 2011, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 303, § 1.

17-12.1-9.
Voting for nominees and delegates — Designation of winning delegates.

Each voter shall vote, within that voter’s party primary, for the presidential nominees of that voter’s choice or may express that voter’s choice for no nominee in a space provided and designated “uncommitted” and for any or all of the number of elected delegates allocated to Rhode Island by the respective national committees. The number of delegates and the designation of the winning delegates shall be determined pursuant to the rules of the political party filed with the secretary of state as provided by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 275, § 2.

17-12.1-10.
Filling of vacancies.

Vacancies shall be filled in the delegation by the alternates in the order of their plurality and in accordance with the rules of the political party.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 275, § 2.

17-12.1-11.
Form of ballot.

The order on the ballot, subject to final determination of any objections filed with the board of elections and the removal of said individual(s) by the secretary of state post-lot, of the presidential nominees and delegates and the uncommitted delegates shall be chosen by lot under the direction of the secretary of state.

Individuals committed to a particular presidential candidate or uncommitted shall appear in a manner so that the candidates for delegates shall be readily identified with the presidential candidate to whom they are committed or shall appear in a manner that clearly shows they are uncommitted.

No person shall appear on the ballot as a candidate for delegate more than once.

There shall be nothing on the ballot to indicate or suggest any political party endorsement.

The secretary of state shall prepare and arrange the ballot for use in the primaries authorized in this title, which shall include, as to the candidates for delegates, the person to whom the candidates are committed and any other information and instruction that the secretary of state shall deem necessary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 275, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 8; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 8; P.L. 2011, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 303, § 1.

17-12.1-12.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter the following terms have the meaning indicated as follows:

“Political party” is defined as provided in §

17-1-2(9)

.

“Uncommitted” means a candidate for delegate not approved by, obligated, or committed to any particular presidential contender.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 275, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 185, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 416, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 80, § 1.

17-12.1-13.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 275, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 15; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 15, effective January 1, 1997.

17-12.1-14.
Recount.

Upon application, the state board of elections shall conduct a recount for a presidential candidate or delegate for a winning candidate when there is a two hundred (200) or less vote difference between the losing candidate or delegate and the winner. Said recount shall be conducted by re-reading the programmed memory device or devices and comparing the results and totals obtained at such recount with the results and totals obtained on election night.

The state board shall have the authority to adopt rules and regulations to implement and administer the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 275, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 264, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 483, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 96.

17-12.1-15.
Political party rules.

The state chairperson of each political party shall, on or before the first Tuesday in January of each year a primary is to be held pursuant to this chapter, file with the secretary of state a certified copy of the complete rules of the political party including, but not limited to, the delegate selection rules and delegate procedure for the national convention of the political party.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 275, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 303, § 1.

17-12.1-16.
Applicability.

The appropriate provisions of this title shall apply to the primaries held under the provisions of this chapter, unless clearly inconsistent with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 275, § 2.